Vermont, session 2025-2026, S257.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 24 V.S.A. § 5088(3) is amended to read:
(3) “Nonprofit public transit system” means a domestic corporation
organized in accordance with Title 11B having:
(A) the majority of its governing board appointed by the legislative
body of the municipality or municipalities served,;
(B) its governing board membership be proportional to the
population of the municipalities served if more than one municipality is served;
VT LEG #385883 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.257
2026 Page 2 of 4
(C) the Secretary of Transportation or designee as an ex officio
nonvoting member; and
(D) a function of providing a public transit service or a foreign
nonprofit corporation located in a state which that borders Vermont and
provides public transit services in both Vermont and the bordering state.
Sec. 2. NONPROFIT PUBLIC TRANSIT SYSTEMS; GOVERNING
BOARD; AGENCY OF TRANSPORTATION OVERSIGHT
(a) Legislative intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) all nonprofit public transit systems in Vermont fully comply with
24 V.S.A. chapter 126; and
(2) 24 V.S.A. § 5088(3), as amended by Sec. 1 of this act, require that a
majority of the governing board of each nonprofit public transit system in
Vermont be appointed by the legislative body of the municipality or
municipalities served by the nonprofit public transit system.
(b) Bylaws.
(1) Any governing boards for a nonprofit public transit system in
Vermont where a majority of the governing board is not appointed by the
legislative body of the municipality or municipalities served by the nonprofit
public transit system shall:
VT LEG #385883 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.257
2026 Page 3 of 4
(A) adopt amendments to the governing board’s bylaws to fully
comply with 24 V.S.A. chapter 126 and subsection (a) of this section on or
before July 31, 2026; and
(B) file a copy of the amended bylaws with the House and Senate
Committees on Transportation on or before November 15, 2026.
(2) The present members of the governing board of a nonprofit public
transit system that amends its bylaws as required under subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall remain on the governing board of the nonprofit public transit
system through their present terms, and the legislative body of the municipality
or municipalities served by the nonprofit public transit system shall follow the
process dictated by the bylaws of the nonprofit public transit system in effect at
the time a term of office expires.
(c) Agency of Transportation oversight. The Agency of Transportation
shall ensure that all nonprofit public transit systems in Vermont are aware of
all applicable State and federal laws, including 24 V.S.A. chapter 126, and
shall, as part of the annual meetings required pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 5091(a),
provide the oversight necessary to ensure compliance with applicable State and
federal laws.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Sec. 2 (governing board compliance) shall take effect
on passage.
VT LEG #385883 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.257
2026 Page 4 of 4
(b) Sec. 1 (24 V.S.A. § 5088(3); definition of nonprofit public transit
system) shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385883 v.1